Washington statutes.
RCW 36.95.050

Resolution creating district.

If after the public meeting or meetings on the petition, the board of county commissioners finds that creation of the proposed district would serve the public interest, the board shall adopt a resolution granting the petition and creating the district. Prior to adoption however, the board may amend the petition in the interest of carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 155 s 5.]